Hawaii statutes.
§326-33 Damien Memorial Chapel. The
Father Damien Memorial Chapel at Kalawao, Molokai, and the premises and
graveyard thereof are hereby declared to be a public memorial to Father Damien.
[L 1935, c 38, §1; RL 1945, §2437; RL 1955, §50-34; HRS §326-33]

Cross References

Saint Damien deVeuster Day, see §8-8.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next